Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-705. Payment of claim to designated beneficiaries or survivors of certain specified public employees killed in the line of duty — Funds — Definitions.

The state shall pay the additional sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the qualified recipient or recipients of a:

One (1) firefighter under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(ii)(b)(1) of this section shall be appointed from a list of names submitted by the Arkansas Professional Fire Fighters Association;

One (1) firefighter under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(ii)(c)(1) of this section shall be appointed from a list of names submitted by the Arkansas State Firefighters Association;

Who was wearing a bulletproof vest approved by the Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police or the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police; and

Whose death occurred:

(A)Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) of the one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be paid by the appropriate state department agency fund account.

The person's children split the award or allowance in equal shares if there are no surviving dependent children; or

The person's surviving parents split the award or allowance in equal shares if there are no surviving children; and

“Surviving dependent children” means children who have not yet reached the age of majority as of the date of the award and children who have a legal incapacity that renders them dependent even after reaching the age of majority.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 43, § 2; 1973, No. 150, § 1; 1973, No. 399, § 2; 1977, No. 936, § 2; 1981, No. 890, § 2; 1985, No. 839, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2348; Acts 1987, No. 349, § 2; 1989, No. 15, §§ 3, 4; 1989, No. 345, § 1; 1991, No. 99, § 1; 1993, No. 809, § 1; 1993, No. 1207, § 1; 1997, No. 547, § 5; 1999, No. 57, § 1; 2001, No. 113, § 5; 2003, No. 355, § 1; 2007, No. 806, § 1; 2009, No. 1313, § 1; 2015, No. 341, § 1; 2015, No. 1058, § 2; 2019, No. 785, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§
1003, 1004.

21-5-706. Funds for payment of claims generally.

All claims allowed under the provisions of this subchapter shall be paid upon award thereof by the Arkansas State Claims Commission from funds appropriated therefor.

The commission may impose reasonable requirements for protecting funds paid under this subchapter to children under eighteen (18) years of age, including, but not limited to, a guardianship of the estate.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 43, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2350; Acts 1997, No. 547, § 6.

21-5-707. Eligibility of children for death benefits.

Unless designated as the beneficiary of a covered public employee under §21-5-708, in order for a natural child to be eligible to receive benefits under this subchapter:

Unless designated as the beneficiary of a covered public employee under §21-5-708, in order for an adopted child to be eligible to receive benefits under this subchapter:

The adopted child must have been adopted prior to the date of the covered public employee's death or total and permanent disability; or

The adopted child's adoption process must have begun prior to the date of the covered public employee's death or total and permanent disability.

Unless designated as the beneficiary of a covered public employee under §21-5-708, in order for a stepchild under nineteen (19) years of age to be eligible to receive benefits under this subchapter:

The stepchild must have been listed as a dependent on the covered public employee's federal and state income tax returns for each of the five (5) income years immediately prior to the date of the covered public employee's death or total and permanent disability; and

The stepchild must have received more than one-half (1/2) of his or her financial support from the covered public employee in each of the five (5) income years immediately prior to the date of the covered public employee's death or total and permanent disability.

Unless designated as the beneficiary of a covered public employee under §21-5-708, in order for a stepchild nineteen (19) years of age or older to be eligible to receive benefits under this subchapter:

The stepchild must have been listed as a dependent on the covered public employee's federal and state income tax returns in each of the five (5) previous income years; and

The stepchild must have received more than one-half (1/2) of his or her financial support from the covered public employee in each of the five (5) previous income years.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 547, § 7; 2005, No. 1962, § 101; 2009, No. 1313, § 2.

21-5-708. Designated beneficiary.

(1)A covered public employee may designate a beneficiary on a form provided by his or her employer.

The form to designate a beneficiary shall be completed by the covered public employee, witnessed, and submitted to his or her employer to be kept in the covered public employee's personnel file.

If the covered public employee does not designate a beneficiary, the benefits shall be paid to the surviving spouse or surviving children under twenty-two (22) years of age or, if there is no surviving spouse or surviving children under twenty-two (22) years of age, then to the surviving children twenty-two (22) years of age or older or to the surviving parents.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1313, § 3; 2015, No. 297, § 1.

Subchapter 8

— Attorney’s Fees and Court Costs

21-5-801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“State agency” means any office, department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution, legislative body, or other agency of this state; and

“State officer” means elected state officials and members of commissions, boards, or other governmental bodies of state agencies.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 805, § 1.

21-5-802. Right to payment — Claims and awards.

Any state officer or state employee who has been subjected to a lawsuit based on an act or omission of the officer or employee while acting within the course and scope of the office or employment and in performance of his or her other official duties shall be entitled to payment from the state for reasonable attorney's fees and court costs incurred by the officer or employee in the action if:

The Attorney General declined to represent the officer or employee; and

The officer or employee acted without malice and in good faith.

Claims for payment shall be filed with the Arkansas State Claims Commission and shall be governed by the laws pertaining to proceedings before the commission.

Awards made by the commission pursuant to this subchapter may be paid from the appropriation and supporting funds of the state agency from which the state officer or state employee is supported if the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State approves payment from the funds after determining that there is sufficient appropriation and funds available for paying the award.

Awards not paid from the appropriation and funds of the state agency shall be paid pursuant to the laws governing payment of claims allowed by the commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2001, No. 1814, § 5: Apr. 18, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many state and public school employees participate in benefits offered through a cafeteria plan; that many state and public school employees participate in voluntary health, disability and other insurance programs; that the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration is charged with the responsibility of administering these plans; that the existing law governing these plans is in need of clarification in order to allow the Employee Benefits Division to obtain bids for these programs at the lowest possible rates; that state and public school employees are in need of obtaining these programs at the lowest possible rates; and, that this act is necessary in order to achieve those objectives. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1987, No. 805, § 2.

Subchapter 9

— Cafeteria Plans

21-5-901. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Cafeteria plan” means a written fringe benefits plan which meets the requirements of the Internal Revenue Code;

“Eligible employee” means full-time employees of governmental entities;

“Governmental entities” means any agency of the state, any city, any county, any school district, or any other political subdivision of this state; and

“Salary reduction agreement” means a written agreement between an eligible employee and a governmental entity whereby the employee agrees to reduce his or her salary by a stated amount or an amount equal to the employee's cost of benefits selected under a cafeteria plan.

U.S. Code. The Internal Revenue Code, referred to in this section, is codified as Title 26 of the U.S. Code.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 810, § 1.

21-5-902. Salary reduction agreement.

Any eligible employee who chooses to participate in a cafeteria plan may enter into a salary reduction agreement with the governmental entity.

The governmental entity is authorized, upon request of the eligible employee, to enter into a salary reduction agreement to reduce, each payday, the salary of the eligible employee by an amount of money or by the employee's cost of the selected benefits as designated by the employee.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 810, § 2.

21-5-903. Computing retirement benefits.

The amount by which an eligible employee's salary is reduced pursuant to a salary reduction agreement shall continue to be included as compensation for the purpose of computing retirement benefits.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 810, § 3.

21-5-904. Administration of cafeteria plans.

The Director of the Employee Benefits Division shall have administrative responsibility for developing, implementing, and maintaining cafeteria plans on behalf of state employees and may promulgate necessary rules as he or she deems necessary to carry out the provision of this section.

This section shall not apply to separate cafeteria plans established by governmental entities prior to April 18, 2001.

However, the exempt governmental entities may choose to participate in a cafeteria plan established pursuant to this section.

The Arkansas State Police Employee Health Plan shall be exempt from any mandatory participation required by this section.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a), added “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the” in the first sentence, substituted “on behalf of state employees and may” for “The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall” and made gender neutral changes; and added (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 899, § 11: March 27, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a substantial number of state employees are eligible for salary increases on July 1, 1997; that this act prescribes the procedure to be followed in awarding salary increases to classified state employees; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted the procedures prescribed herein will not be in effect until after July 1, 1997. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1461, § 14: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that several position changes have been incorporated into agencies' budgets to begin July 1, 2001 and that changes to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act must also take effect at that time to prevent confusion and uncertainty. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 8: July 1, 2003, except § 7, effective May 8, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in compensation levels enacted during the previous session of the General Assembly were applicable to the current biennium and that without this act becoming effective at the beginning of the fiscal year state employees could not be compensated at the approved level. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and Section 7 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto a bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto; and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2017, No. 365, § 29: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (b), inserted “shall be” following “Employees” and deleted “who exceed standards in the performance of their duties shall be eligible for incentive pay awards” following “Administration”; and deleted (c).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); substituted “State agency, board, and commission employees” for “Employees” in (b)(1); and added (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (b)(2).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning definitions for performance evaluation categories and the performance evaluation process, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 365, §§25 and 26. The sections were derived from the following sources:

21-5-1002. Acts 1997, No. 899, § 2; 2001, No. 1461, § 9; 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 5.

21-5-1003. Acts 1997, No. 899, § 3; 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 6; 2007, No. 449, § 1; 2009, No. 252, § 4.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning annual evaluation, amount of incentive pay award, and analysis of current system, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1461, § 10. The sections were derived from the following sources:

21-5-1004. Acts 1997, No. 899, §4.

21-5-1005. Acts 1997, No. 899, §5.

21-5-1006. Acts 1997, No. 899, §6.

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 1061, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas requires the General Assembly to develop a career ladder incentive program which will allow for the development of a competency based pay program for employees of state agencies and institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 1461, § 14: July 1, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that several position changes have been incorporated into agencies' budgets to begin July 1, 2001 and that changes to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act must also take effect at that time to prevent confusion and uncertainty. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 8: July 1, 2003, except § 7, effective May 8, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that several changes in compensation levels enacted during the previous session of the General Assembly were applicable to the current biennium and that without this act becoming effective at the beginning of the fiscal year state employees could not be compensated at the approved level. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and Section 7 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective after the date of its passage and approval. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto a bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto; and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2007, No. 289, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that provisions of this act changes the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act and should become effective July 1, 2007, for consistent application and to avoid confusion and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, No. 799, § 4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the consideration of retirement benefits in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and that the ideal and most efficient time to make revisions to the consideration of retirement benefits is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 15: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is immediately necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 1017, § 11: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state salary classification schedules must be updated and revised; that the fiscal year for state employees begins each July 1; and that this act is essential and immediately necessary to implement the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act and to ensure the continued, uninterrupted operation of state government and services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 1321, § 7: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the state salary classification schedules must be updated and revised; that the fiscal year for state employees begins each July 1; and that this act is essential and immediately necessary to implement the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act and to ensure the continued, uninterrupted operation of state government and services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2017, No. 365, § 29: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees begins on July 1 of every year and that the implementation of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment added (c) through (g).

The 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment rewrote present (c).

The 2009 amendment, in (a), deleted “a job series promotion system and” following “implement” in the introductory language, and deleted “of higher education” following “institutions” in (a)(1) and (a)(2); in (b)(2), substituted “who has had continuous part-time employment with the state for twelve (12) months” for “that completes two thousand eighty (2,080) hours” and inserted “and to receive the merit pay increase on a pro rata basis; deleted (c)(2) and redesignated the remaining subdivision accordingly; substituted “2009” for “2007, for the 2007-2009 biennium” in the introductory language of (e); rewrote (f); added (h); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment deleted “salary adjustments or” preceding “lump-sum payments” in (c); substituted “2011” for “2009” in the introductory language of (e); rewrote (f)(1)(A); and added “and the payment shall not be construed as exceeding maximum salary” in (f)(1)(B) and (C).

The 2013 amendment inserted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (d); changed the date from 2011 to 2013 in (e); substituted “merit increase of one and five-tenths percent (1.5%)” for “one and five tenths percent (1.5%) merit increase” in (e)(1); substituted “merit increase of three percent (3%)” for “three percent (3.0%) merit increase” in (e)(2); and substituted “merit increase of four and five-tenths percent (4.5%)” for “four and five-tenths percent (4.5%) merit increase” in (e)(3).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (a); deleted former (b); redesignated former (c) and (d) as (b) and (c); deleted “lump-sum” preceding “payments” in (b); substituted “agencies in accordance with procedures” for “agencies and institutions in accordance with rules” in (c); and deleted (e) through (h).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 389, § 1; 2001, No. 1814, §§ 3, 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2327.

Subchapter 10

— Employee Performance Evaluation

21-5-1001. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that each state agency, board, commission, and institution of higher education evaluate the performance of its employees annually.

(1)State agency, board, and commission employees shall be evaluated using an instrument approved by the Office of Personnel Management.

Institution of higher education employees shall be evaluated using an instrument approved by the Division of Higher Education.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 899, § 1; 2001, No. 1461, § 8; 2017, No. 365, § 24; 2019, No. 910, § 2311.

21-5-1002, 21-5-1003. [Repealed.]

21-5-1007. Annual leave.

When an officer or employee of a state office or agency excluded from the provisions of the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, §21-4-201 et seq., by the definition of “state agencies” in §21-4-203 leaves employment of the excluded office or agency and becomes employed by an agency or institution which is subject to the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, §21-4-201 et seq., the period of employment with the excluded office or agency shall be included as state employee service for the purpose of determining the rate at which the employee earns paid annual leave.

The provisions of this section shall be applied in computing annual leave earned after March 27, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 899, § 7.

Subchapter 11

— Career Ladder Incentive Program

21-5-1101. Merit increase pay system — Definition.

(1)The Department of Transformation and Shared Services is authorized to develop and establish a merit increase pay system in accordance with the performance evaluation process under §21-5-1001 et seq. for employees of all state agencies, boards, and commissions covered by the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq.

The merit increase pay system shall be reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

For the purpose of this subchapter, “merit increase pay system” means a merit-based pay system that incorporates pay and performance evaluation standards according to §21-5-1001 et seq. and establishes criteria for payments for employees who meet requisite performance categories.

Merit payments may be awarded to employees who satisfy performance evaluation-based criteria developed by agencies in accordance with procedures and policies developed and approved by the Office of Personnel Management after review by the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1061, § 1; 2001, No. 1461, § 12; 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 4; 2007, No. 289, § 1; 2007, No. 799, § 2; 2009, No. 688, § 14; 2011, No. 1017, § 10; 2013, No. 1321, § 6; 2017, No. 365, § 27; 2019, No. 910, § 6149.

Subchapter 12

— Active Duty After September 11, 2001

21-5-1201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Emergency nature or contingency” means:

Any case or imminent danger of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, or breach of peace;

A threat to the public health or security; or

A threat to the maintenance of law and order; and

“State agency” includes the Arkansas Department of Transportation, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, and the State Highway Commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (2).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2113, § 3; 2017, No. 707, §
75.

21-5-1202. Compensation of employees of state agencies and state-supported institutions of higher education — Emergency activities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, § 21-4-201 et seq., during the period that an employee of a state agency or institution of higher education is called to active duty after September 11, 2001, as a member of the National Guard or any of the reserve components of the armed services by order of the President of the United States or the Governor of an emergency nature or contingency for more than thirty (30) consecutive days, the employee shall be eligible for continued proportionate salary payments which, when combined with the employee's active duty pay, incentives, and allowances, except for uniform and clothing allowances, equal the amount that the employee would have otherwise received but for the employee's required active duty under the order of the President or the Governor.

The Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall establish appropriate procedures for the administration of this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 1255, § 2: Jan. 1, 2016.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2113, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6150.

21-5-1203. Compensation of public school district employee — Emergency activities.

Notwithstanding any other law, during the period that an employee of a public school district is called to active duty after September 11, 2001, as a member of the National Guard or any of the reserve components of the armed services by order of the President of the United States or the Governor of an emergency nature or contingency for more than thirty (30) consecutive days, the employee shall be eligible for continued proportionate salary payments which, when combined with the employee's active duty pay, equal the amount that the employee would have otherwise received but for the employee's required active duty under the order of the President or the Governor.

The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall establish appropriate procedures for the administration of this section.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2113, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2312.

Subchapter 13

— Deferred Contribution to a Tuition Savings Program

21-5-1301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Agency” means a board, commission, department, officer, or other authority of the government of the State of Arkansas.

“Agency” does not include the General Assembly, the courts, and Governor; and

“Tuition savings program” means an account as defined under § 6-84-103(1).

History.

2015, No. 1255, §
1.

21-5-1302. Participation in tuition savings program.

When a state employee begins his or her employment with an agency, the agency shall notify the state employee that:

The tuition savings program is available; and

The employee may have a regular distribution made to the tuition savings program from his or her salary before the state employee receives his or her payroll deposit or pay check.

Upon request of the state employee, the agency charged with the duty to distribute the state employee's salary may withhold, by agreement with the state employee, an amount of money from the state employee's salary each payday for deposit into the employee's tuition savings program.

The amount withheld from the state employee's salary shall be designated by the state employee.

The agency that enters an agreement under this subsection shall deposit the money withheld from the state employee's salary into the state employee's tuition savings program at the time the state employee's salary is distributed to the state employee.

An agency that is charged with the duty to distribute the state employee's salary shall adopt formal policies and guidelines in furtherance of this subchapter.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 599, § 5: July 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by theGeneral Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal year for employees of institutions of higher education begins annually on July 1; and that the implementation of the Higher Education Uniform Classification and Compensation Act is necessary to ensure the continued services and operations of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

Acts 2019, No. 763, § 13: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the compensation plan for institutions of higher education; and that the optimal time to implement this act is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and in concert with the appropriation acts for each institution of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

2015, No. 1255, §
1.

Subchapter 14

— Higher Education Uniform Classification and Compensation Act

21-5-1401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Higher Education Uniform Classification and Compensation Act”.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 599, §
4.